Illinois, session 104th, SB1505.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Small Business Job Creation Tax Credit Act 5is amended by changing Sections 10, 25, and 35 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 25/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Applicant" means a person that is operating a business 9located within the State of Illinois that is engaged in 10interstate or intrastate commerce and either:11        (1) has no more than 50 full-time employees, without 12    regard to the location of employment of such employees at 13    the beginning of the incentive period; or 14        (2) for incentive periods ending on or before June 30, 15    2016, hired within the incentive period an employee who 16    had participated as worker-trainee in the Put Illinois to 17    Work Program during 2010. 18    In the case of any person that is a member of a unitary 19business group within the meaning of subdivision (a)(27) of 20Section 1501 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, "applicant" 21refers to the unitary business group.22    "Certificate" means the tax credit certificate issued by 23the Department under Section 35 of this Act.   SB1505- 2 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    "Certificate of eligibility" means the certificate issued 2by the Department under Section 20 of this Act. 3    "Credit" means the amount awarded by the Department to an 4applicant by issuance of a certificate under Section 35 of 5this Act for each new full-time equivalent employee hired or 6job created.7    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity.9    "Director" means the Director of the Department.10    "Full-time employee" means an individual who is employed 11for a basic wage for at least 35 hours each week or who renders 12any other standard of service generally accepted by industry 13custom or practice as full-time employment. An individual for 14whom a W-2 is issued by a Professional Employer Organization 15is a full-time employee if he or she is employed in the service 16of the applicant for a basic wage for at least 35 hours each 17week or renders any other standard of service generally 18accepted by industry custom or practice as full-time 19employment. For the purposes of this Act, such an individual 20shall be considered a full-time employee of the applicant.21    "Professional Employer Organization" (PEO) shall have the 22same meaning as defined in Section 5-5 of the Economic 23Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act. As used in 24this Section, "Professional Employer Organization" does not 25include a day and temporary labor service agency regulated 26under the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act.   SB1505- 3 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    "Incentive period" means the period beginning on July 1 2and ending on June 30 of the following year. The first series 3of incentive periods period shall begin on July 1, 2010 and the 4last incentive period shall end on June 30, 2016. The second 5series of incentive periods shall begin on July 1, 2025 and end 6on June 30, 2032.7    "Basic wage" means compensation for employment that is no 8less than $10 per hour or the equivalent salary for a new 9employee.10    "New employee" means a full-time employee who first became 11employed by an applicant with less than 50 full-time employees 12within the incentive period, whose hire results in a net 13increase in the applicant's full-time Illinois employees, and 14who is receiving a basic wage as compensation. : 15        (1) who first became employed by an applicant with 16    less than 50 full-time employees within the incentive 17    period whose hire results in a net increase in the 18    applicant's full-time Illinois employees and who is 19    receiving a basic wage as compensation; or 20        (2) who participated as a worker-trainee in the Put 21    Illinois to Work Program during 2010 and who is 22    subsequently hired during the incentive period by an 23    applicant and who is receiving a basic wage as 24    compensation. 25    The term "new employee" does not include:26        (1) a person who was previously employed in Illinois   SB1505- 4 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    by the applicant or a related member prior to the onset of 2    the incentive period; or3        (2) any individual who has a direct or indirect 4    ownership interest of at least 5% in the profits, capital, 5    or value of the applicant or a related member.6    "Noncompliance date" means, in the case of an applicant 7that is not complying with the requirements of the provisions 8of this Act, the day following the last date upon which the 9taxpayer was in compliance with the requirements of the 10provisions of this Act, as determined by the Director, 11pursuant to Section 45 of this Act.12    "Put Illinois to Work Program" means a worker training and 13employment program that was established by the State of 14Illinois with funding from the United States Department of 15Health and Human Services of Emergency Temporary Assistance 16for Needy Families funds authorized by the American Recovery 17and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA TANF Funds). These ARRA 18TANF funds were in turn used by the State of Illinois to fund 19the Put Illinois to Work Program. 20    "Related member" means a person that, with respect to the 21applicant during any portion of the incentive period, is any 22one of the following,23        (1) An individual, if the individual and the members 24    of the individual's family (as defined in Section 318 of 25    the Internal Revenue Code) own directly, indirectly, 26    beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at   SB1505- 5 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    least 50% of the value of the outstanding profits, 2    capital, stock, or other ownership interest in the 3    applicant.4        (2) A partnership, estate, or trust and any partner or 5    beneficiary, if the partnership, estate, or trust and its 6    partners or beneficiaries own directly, indirectly, 7    beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at 8    least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or other 9    ownership interest in the applicant.10        (3) A corporation, and any party related to the 11    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 12    of stock from the corporation under the attribution rules 13    of Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 14    applicant and any other related member own, in the 15    aggregate, directly, indirectly, beneficially, or 16    constructively, at least 50% of the value of the 17    corporation's outstanding stock.18        (4) A corporation and any party related to that 19    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 20    of stock from the corporation to the party or from the 21    party to the corporation under the attribution rules of 22    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 23    corporation and all such related parties own, in the 24    aggregate, at least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or 25    other ownership interest in the applicant.26        (5) A person to or from whom there is attribution of   SB1505- 6 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    stock ownership in accordance with Section 1563(e) of the 2    Internal Revenue Code, except that for purposes of 3    determining whether a person is a related member under 4    this paragraph, "20%" shall be substituted for "5%" 5    whenever "5%" appears in Section 1563(e) of the Internal 6    Revenue Code.7(Source: P.A. 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 8    (35 ILCS 25/25)9    Sec. 25. Tax credit. 10    (a) Subject to the conditions set forth in this Act, an 11applicant is entitled to a credit against payment of taxes 12withheld under Section 704A of the Illinois Income Tax Act: 13        (1) for new employees who participated as 14    worker-trainees in the Put Illinois to Work Program during 15    2010, for incentive periods ending on or before June 30, 16    2016: 17            (A) in the first calendar year ending on or after 18        the date that is 6 months after December 31, 2010, or 19        the date of hire, whichever is later. Under this 20        subparagraph, the applicant is entitled to one-half of 21        the credit allowable for each new employee who is 22        employed for at least 6 months after the date of hire; 23        and 24            (B) in the first calendar year ending on or after 25        the date that is 12 months after December 31, 2010, or   SB1505- 7 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1        the date of hire, whichever is later. Under this 2        subparagraph, the applicant is entitled to one-half of 3        the credit allowable for each new employee who is 4        employed for at least 12 months after the date of hire; 5         (2) for all other new employees, in the first 6    calendar year ending on or after the date that is 12 months 7    after the date of hire of a new employee. The credit shall 8    be allowed as a credit to an applicant for each full-time 9    employee hired during the incentive period that results in 10    a net increase in full-time Illinois employees, where the 11    net increase in the employer's full-time Illinois 12    employees is maintained for at least 12 months. 13    (b) The Department shall make credit awards under this Act 14to further job creation.15    (c) The credit shall be claimed for the first calendar 16year ending on or after the date on which the certificate is 17issued by the Department.18    (d) The credit shall not exceed $2,500 per new employee 19hired.20    (e) The net increase in full-time Illinois employees, 21measured on an annual full-time equivalent basis, shall be the 22total number of full-time Illinois employees of the applicant 23on the final day of the incentive period, minus the number of 24full-time Illinois employees employed by the employer on the 25first day of that same incentive period. For purposes of the 26calculation, an employer that begins doing business in this   SB1505- 8 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1State during the incentive period, as determined by the 2Director, shall be treated as having zero Illinois employees 3on the first day of the incentive period.4    (f) The net increase in the number of full-time Illinois 5employees of the applicant under subsection (e) must be 6sustained continuously for at least 12 months, starting with 7the date of hire of a new employee during the incentive period. 8Eligibility for the credit does not depend on the continuous 9employment of any particular individual. For purposes of this 10subsection (f), if a new employee ceases to be employed before 11the completion of the 12-month period for any reason, the net 12increase in the number of full-time Illinois employees shall 13be treated as continuous if a different new employee is hired 14as a replacement within a reasonable time for the same 15position within 8 weeks after the position becomes vacant.16    (g) The Department shall promulgate rules to enable an 17applicant for which a PEO has been contracted to issue W-2s and 18make payment of taxes withheld under Section 704A of the 19Illinois Income Tax Act for new employees to retain the 20benefit of tax credits to which the applicant is otherwise 21entitled under this Act. 22(Source: P.A. 96-888, eff. 4-13-10; 96-1498, eff. 1-18-11; 2397-636, eff. 6-1-12; 97-1052, eff. 8-23-12.) 24    (35 ILCS 25/35)25    Sec. 35. Application for award of tax credit; tax credit   SB1505- 9 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1certificate. 2    (a) On or after the conclusion of the 12-month period (or 36-month period, for purposes of subparagraph (A) of item (1) 4of subsection (a) of Section 25) after a new employee has been 5hired, an applicant shall file with the Department an 6application for award of a credit. The application shall 7include the following:8        (1) The names, Social Security numbers, job 9    descriptions, salary or wage rates, and dates of hire of 10    the new employees with respect to whom the credit is being 11    requested, and an indication of whether each new employee 12    listed participated as a worker-trainee in the Put 13    Illinois to Work Program.14        (2) A certification that each new employee listed has 15    been retained on the job for one year (or 6 months, for 16    purposes of subparagraph (A) of item (1) of subsection (a) 17    of Section 25) from the date of hire.18        (3) The number of new employees hired by the applicant 19    during the incentive period.20        (4) The net increase in the number of full-time 21    Illinois employees of the applicant (including the new 22    employees listed in the request) between the beginning of 23    the incentive period and the dates on which the new 24    employees listed in the request were hired. This 25    requirement does not apply for tax credits the applicant 26    is seeking because the new employee had participated as a   SB1505- 10 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    worker-trainee in the Put Illinois to Work Program. 2        (5) An agreement that the Director is authorized to 3    verify with the appropriate State agencies the information 4    contained in the request before issuing a certificate to 5    the applicant.6        (6) Any other information the Department determines to 7    be appropriate.8    (b) Although an application may be filed at any time after 9the conclusion of the 12-month period (or 6-month period, for 10purposes of subparagraph (A) of item (1) of subsection (a) of 11Section 25) after a new employee was hired, an application 12filed more than 90 days after the earliest date on which it 13could have been filed shall not be awarded any credit if, prior 14to the date it is filed, the Department has received 15applications under this Section for credits totaling more than 16$50,000,000.17    (c) The Department shall issue a certificate to each 18applicant awarded a credit under this Act. The certificate 19shall include the following:20        (1) The name and taxpayer identification number of the 21    applicant.22        (2) The date on which the certificate is issued.23        (3) The credit amount that will be allowed.24        (4) Any other information the Department determines to 25    be appropriate.26(Source: P.A. 96-888, eff. 4-13-10; 96-1498, eff. 1-18-11.)   SB1505- 11 -LRB104 07601 HLH 17645 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.